Maryland, session 2026, SB0988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
Title 13. Court Supporting Agencies, RECORDS, AND JUDICIAL FACILITIES.
SUBTITLE 8. JUDICIAL FACILITIES.
13–801.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0988*

SENATE BILL 988
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “JUDICIAL FACILITY” MEANS A COURTHOUSE, AN
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING FACILITY, OR OTHER LOCATION OR SPACE, WHETHER
OWNED OR LEASED BY A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, USED FOR
JUDICIAL OR QUASI–JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS.
(II) “JUDICIAL FACILITY” INCLUDES ANY PATHWAY, HALLWAY,
PARKING LOT OR STRUCTURE, GROUNDS, OR OTHER AREA WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF A
COURTHOUSE, AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING FACILITY, OR OTHER LOCATION USED
FOR JUDICIAL OR QUASI–JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS.
(3) “PERSON” INCLUDES A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, AND ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCY OR GOVERNMENT
AGENT.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A STOP, DETENTION, OR ARREST:
(1) RELATING TO A SUSPECTED CRIMINAL OFFENSE;
(2) MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH A VALID WARRANT;
(3) MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 3–814, 3–821, AND 3–8A–26 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
(4) FOR CONTEMPT OF COURT;
(5) MADE IN ORDER TO CONDUCT AN EXAMINATION UNDER § 3–105
OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(6) MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–613 THROUGH 10–619 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
(7) OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT STOP, DETAIN, OR ARREST AN INDIVIDUAL FOR AN
ALLEGED OR ADJUDICATED OFFENSE THAT IS SUBJECT ONLY TO A CIVIL PENALTY
WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL IS IN A JUDICIAL FACILITY OR IS TRAVELING WITHIN 1 MILE
OF A JUDICIAL FACILITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ATTENDING A MEETING, A HEARING,
OR ANOTHER OFFICIAL PROCEEDING IN THE JUDICIAL FACILITY UNLESS THE
PERSON:

SENATE BILL 988 3
(1) PROVIDES PRIOR NOTICE TO THE PRESIDING JUDGE OR COURT
ADMINISTRATOR THAT A STOP, DETENTION, OR ARREST MAY OCCUR; AND
(2) MAKES THE STOP, DETENTION, OR ARREST IN A MANNER THAT
DOES NOT DISRUPT PROCEEDINGS OR DETER ACCESS TO JUSTICE BY ANY
INDIVIDUAL.
(D) EVIDENCE OBTAINED AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS
INADMISSIBLE AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL STOPPED, DETAINED, OR ARRESTED IN
ANY PROCEEDING OVER WHICH A STATE COURT OR STATE OR LOCAL ENTITY HAS
JURISDICTION.
(E) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL STOPPED, DETAINED, OR ARRESTED IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A PERSON
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE STOP, DETENTION, OR ARREST IN A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION.
(2) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY AWARD:
(I) DAMAGES;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(III) ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(F) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO ENJOIN A
PERSON FROM COMMITTING A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intention of the
General Assembly that this Act shall supplement the protections provided under Chapter
718 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.